Louisiana, session 2026, SB356.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2382 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2382. Air quality monitoring systems
A. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
meanings ascribed to them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Acute exposure level" means the concentration of a toxic air
pollutant, measured on a rolling one-hour average, at which health effects may
occur. For purposes of this Section, acute exposure levels for toxic air pollutants
shall be as follows:
(a) Ammonia - 3,200 micrograms per cubic meter.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-186 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 356
(b) Benzene - 27 micrograms per cubic meter.
(c) 1,3-Butadiene - 660 micrograms per cubic meter.
(d) Chlorine - 210 micrograms per cubic meter.
(e) Formaldehyde - 55 micrograms per cubic meter.
(f) Hydrogen cyanide - 340 micrograms per cubic meter.
(g) Hydrogen fluoride - 240 micrograms per cubic meter.
(h) Hydrogen sulfide - 42 micrograms per cubic meter.
(i) Sulfur dioxide - 660 micrograms per cubic meter.
(j) Toluene - 37,000 micrograms per cubic meter.
(k) Vinyl chloride - 180,000 micrograms per cubic meter.
(l) Xylenes - 22,000 micrograms per cubic meter.
(2) "Air monitoring system" means equipment that continuously
measures, records, and reports, in real-time, toxic air pollutant concentrations
at or near a facility's property boundary. For purposes of this Section, an air
monitoring system shall at a minimum meet the United States Environmental
Protections Agency's monitoring requirements of 40 CFR Part 63, as amended,
and shall include all of the following:
(a) Sensing instrumentation that continuously monitors and records
emissions of toxic air pollutants along an open path or paths at or adjacent to
the facility's property boundary and that provides coverage of the entire
boundary of the facility. Equipment shall monitor emissions during both
routine operations and unplanned releases.
(b) Data systems and equipment that continuously collect, process, and
automatically disseminate both real-time and historical toxic air pollutant
concentrations, variations, and trends, through a publicly accessible website.
(c) Weather instrumentation that continuously measures ambient
temperature, wind speed, wind direction, and relative humidity.
(d) Notification systems and equipment that provide a real-time
community alert when an air monitoring system detects that the rolling one-
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-186 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 356
hour average concentration of a toxic air pollutant exceeds the acute exposure
threshold.
(3) "Air monitoring system plan" means a written plan to be submitted
by the facility to the department, prior to installation or operation of an air
monitoring system, which shall include the following:
(a) An inventory of equipment and instruments used to continuously
monitor, record, and report toxic air pollutant concentrations on the entire
boundary of the facility, including specifications and locations given in GPS
coordinates.
(b) An inventory of equipment and instruments used to continuously
measure and record ambient temperature, wind speed, wind direction, relative
humidity, and any other meteorological data within the boundaries of the
facility, including specifications and locations given in GPS coordinates.
(c) The location of each open path utilized by the facility's air monitoring
system to monitor toxic air pollutants.
(d) Quality assurance and quality control protocols for data collected by
the air monitoring system.
(e) Methods utilized to graphically display real-time and historical toxic
air pollutant concentration data on a publicly available website.
(f) Methods utilized to notify the public of unplanned releases.
(g) Air monitoring system maintenance schedules.
(h) Emergency measures to be implemented in the event of air
monitoring system equipment or power failure.
(i) Air monitoring system installation and implementation schedule.
(4) "Facility" means an emissions point or group of emissions points with
annual emissions, as reported to the office of environmental assessment for the
three most recent calendar years, of greater than fifty pounds for any of the
toxic air pollutants provided in Paragraph (5) of this Subsection, and that is
classified under the North American Industry Classification Code System as one
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-186 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 356
of the following:
(a) NAICS 324110 - petroleum refineries.
(b) NAICS 325 - chemical manufacturing.
(5) "Toxic air pollutant" means any of the following substances when
airborne:
(a) Ammonia.
(b) Benzene.
(c) 1,3-Butadiene.
(d) Chlorine.
(e) Diethanolamine.
(f) Ethylbenzene.
(g) Ethylene dichloride.
(h) Ethylene oxide.
(i) Formaldehyde.
(j) Hydrogen cyanide.
(k) Hydrogen fluoride.
(l) Hydrogen sulfide.
(m) Naphthalene.
(n) Sulfur dioxide.
(o) Toluene.
(p) Vinyl chloride.
(q) Xylenes.
B. Each facility, as defined in this Section, shall be responsible for design,
install, operate, and maintain an air monitoring system in accordance with this
Section. The owner of a facility shall be responsible for all costs related to an air
monitoring system installed on the facility, including but not limited to design,
procurement, installation, operation, maintenance, record keeping, reporting,
air monitoring system plan review and approval.
C. When an air monitoring system detects that the rolling one-hour
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-186 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 356
average concentration of a toxic air pollutant exceeds the acute exposure
threshold, the facility shall provide notification of an alert to interested persons.
An alert shall be provided to first responders, the department, and impacted
local governing authorities. The facility shall maintain a registration system
whereby any interested party shall be allowed to request electronic alerts
pursuant to this Subparagraph.
D. The owner of a facility shall be responsible for submitting to the
department quarterly reports summarizing the real-time and historical average
measurements for each toxic air pollutant provided for in Paragraph (A)(5) of
this Section. The report shall be submitted electronically in a format to be
specified by the department. The facility shall maintain all data collected by an
air monitoring system on-site and shall make the data accessible for
examination by the department for a period of five years.
E. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to implement the requirements of this Section.
F. The department shall periodically, but not less than every five years,
review and revise as needed, based on the best available scientific evidence, the
list of facilities, toxic air pollutants, and acute exposure levels that are subject
to the requirements of this Section.